src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-naqgrw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - naʼgrõ: # Verb 61 'eng /est naerda/fin' - full paradigm
     naʼgrõ+V+Inf: [naʼgrõ, nagrõ]
     naʼgrõ+V+Ger: [naʼgrõs, nagrõs]
     naʼgrõ+V+Sup: [naʼgrõm, nagrõm]
     naʼgrõ+V+Sup+Ine: [naʼgrõmõs, nagrõmõs]
     naʼgrõ+V+Sup+Ela: [naʼgrõmõst, nagrõmõst]
     naʼgrõ+V+Sup+Tra: [naʼgrõmõks, nagrõmõks]
     naʼgrõ+V+Sup+Abe: [naʼgrõmõt, nagrõmõt]
     naʼgrõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [naʼgrõb, nagrõb]
     naʼgrõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [naʼgrõt, nagrõt]
     naʼgrõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [naʼgrõbõd, nagrõbõd]
     naʼgrõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [naʼgriz, nagriz]
     naʼgrõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [[naʼgrizt, naʼgriztõ], [nagrizt, naʼgriztõ]]
     naʼgrõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [[naʼgrizt, naʼgriztõ], [nagrizt, naʼgriztõ]]
     naʼgrõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: [naʼgrõ, nagrõ]
     naʼgrõ+V+Cond+Sg3: [naʼgrõks, nagrõks]
     naʼgrõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: [naʼggõr, naggõr]
     naʼgrõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: [naʼggõr, naggõr]
     naʼgrõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: [naʼgrõgid, nagrõgid]
     naʼgrõ+V+Jus+Sg3: [naʼgrõg, nagrõg]
     naʼgrõ+V+Quo+Sg3: [naʼgriji, nagriji]
     naʼgrõ+V+ActPrfPrc: [naʼgrõn, nagrõn]
     naʼgrõ+V+PssPrfPrc: [naʼggõrtõd, naggõrtõd]
